Hawaii statutes.
§709-905 Endangering the welfare of an
incompetent person. (1) A person commits the offense of endangering the
welfare of an incompetent person if he knowingly acts in a manner likely to be
injurious to the physical or mental welfare of a person who is unable to care
for himself because of physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect.

(2) Endangering the welfare of an incompetent
person is a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §709-905

This section seeks to expand the protection which the law
affords to incompetents by making it roughly equivalent to that afforded to
minors. A child who suffers from a mental or physical disease, disorder, or
defect is protected as a child from certain dangers by §§709-902 through 904
which make abandonment, persistent nonsupport, and endangering the welfare of a
minor penal offenses. A person who is physically incapacitated or mentally
incompetent is afforded protection against sexual assault and abuse by chapter
707, which makes such conduct, as it relates to such persons, an offense.
However, in cases not involving sexual activity or not specifically involving
minors under §§709-902 through 904, there is, without §709-905, a gap in the
coverage of the Code. This gap also existed in prior law.

Case Notes

Family court did not abuse its discretion by requiring
defendant to attend domestic violence counseling as a condition of defendant's
probation; where defendant was charged with endangering the welfare of an
incompetent person under this section based on substantial evidence that
defendant assaulted complainant, under §706-624(2), the court was free to
impose discretionary conditions of probation that are reasonably related to the
factors set forth in §706-606 and to the extent that the conditions involve
only deprivations of liberty as is reasonably necessary for the purposes
indicated in §706-606(2). 121 H. 228 (App.), 216 P.3d 1251 (2009).

Section is not unconstitutionally vague or overbroad; under a
plain reading of this section, the phrase "likely to be injurious"
is reasonably clear and provides sufficient notice to a person of ordinary
intelligence that knowingly engaging in conduct that would probably cause harm
to an incompetent person's welfare is prohibited; section is also clear that
the accused must wilfully engage in conduct that would likely harm the
incompetent person's welfare, "which is the antithesis of an intentional
act that may injure but is performed in the incompetent person's best interest".
121 H. 228 (App.), 216 P.3d 1251 (2009).

Where witness testimonies, particularly when viewed in the
light strongest for the State, substantially supported the findings that
complainant was unable to care for complainant's self because of a mental
disability and defendant knew defendant's actions were likely to injure
complainant's physical or mental welfare, there was sufficient evidence to
convict defendant under this section. 121 H. 228 (App.), 216 P.3d 1251 (2009).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next